Louisiana, session 2026, HB671.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:1108(C)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
30:1108(C)(3) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1108. Eminent domain; expropriation
* * *
C.(1) In addition to the requirements of Paragraph Paragraphs (2) and (3) of
this Subsection and any other power of eminent domain authorized by law, eminent
domain authority authorized under this Chapter shall be exercised pursuant to the
procedures found in R.S. 19:2. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
expropriation hearings conducted pursuant to this Chapter shall be heard in the parish
in which the property subject to the expropriation is situated.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-185 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 671
(3)(a) The eminent domain authorized by this Section may only be exercised
pursuant to the procedures contained in this Subsection and all pre-petition
procedures required by law shall be performed by an acquisition agent appointed by
the Department of Conservation and Energy. An acquisition agent may be an
employee of the department or a private entity contracted by the department to
perform the required procedures.
(b) Acquisition agents shall not have any financial interest in the outcome
of negotiations or expropriation proceedings and shall be subject to all legal
requirements applicable to the expropriating authority.
(c) The expropriating authority shall reimburse the department for the
acquisition agent's wages and any expenses related to the completion of the
procedures.
* * *